Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 86. LANDS--PUBLIC

CHAPTER 4. OIL AND GAS

Art. 5341d. EXTENSION OF LEASES ON UNIVERSITY LAND; WAR AGENCY RESTRICTIONS.

Sec. 1. In the case of any non-producing oil, gas or mineral lease on University land, if one hundred twenty (120) days before expiration of the primary term there be in effect any restrictions issued by a Federal war agency prohibiting the drilling or completion of a well thereon, the holder of such lease shall have the right to negotiate an extension or renewal of such lease for a period of not longer than two (2) years with the Board of Regents of the University of Texas and the Commissioner of the General Land Office.

The Board of Regents of the University of Texas and the Commissioner of the General Land Office, in considering an application for an extension or renewal of any such lease above described, shall take into consideration in establishing the consideration for such lease the diligence with which the lessee has followed his duties under the existing lease, the present value of the land upon which an extension or renewal of the lease is sought, and all other good business practices. The lessee in presenting his application for extension or renewal of such lease or leases shall present evidence to the Board of Regents of the University of Texas and to the Commissioner of the General Land Office showing it was impossible for him or any of his co-owners to comply with the restrictions which he claims prohibited the drilling or completion of the well on said tract.

If the lessee should claim as grounds for an extension or renewal of any such lease that there is insufficient acreage within the tract under lease by him to comply with the Federal restriction then no extension or renewal shall be granted unless said lessee also show that there is no adjacent and adjoining acreage to said tract wherein said applicant is a party in interest that could have been combined with the tract upon which the application for extension or renewal is made in order to comply with the Federal restriction.

Sec. 2. The Commissioner of the General Land Office is hereby authorized to issue to the lease owner such instrument in writing in the nature of an extension or renewal of such lease as may be necessary or proper to carry into effect the foregoing provision of this Act.

Sec. 3. The provisions of this Act are and shall be held and construed to be cumulative of all General Laws of this state on the subject treated of and embraced in this Act when not in conflict herewith, but in case of conflict, in whole or in part, this Act shall control.

Sec. 4. If any section, subdivision, paragraph, sentence, or clause of this Act be held to be unconstitutional, the remaining portions of same shall nevertheless be held valid and binding.

Acts 1943, 48th Leg., p. 359, ch. 238.

Art. 5341e. SUSPENSION OF RUNNING OF TERMS OF LEASES WHILE OWNER IS DENIED ACCESS BY UNITED STATES. If the owner of any valid oil and gas lease granted by the State covering University lands is denied access to or is denied a permit to drill upon or produce from the leased premises by any duly constituted authority of the United States of America, after a bona fide attempt has been made by such owner to obtain access or permit to drill upon or produce from the leased premises, and denial of access as used herein shall include agreements by the lessee or his assigns under any such lease with a duly constituted authority of the United States not to enter upon and engage in drilling operations on any such oil and gas lease made under compulsion or threat of condemnation by such duly constituted authority of the United States, such owner may file with the Board for Lease of University Lands an application describing and giving the date of the action which deprives him of the right of access or the right to drill upon or produce from the premises, and if said Board is satisfied that the facts set forth in the application are true, the Board may enter an order upon its minutes suspending the running of both the primary and the principal term of such lease, or suspending any condition, obligation, or duty thereunder as of the date of the origin of the cause of suspension and during the existence of the cause of suspension, so long as the lessee continues to make on each anniversary date of such lease the annual rental payments stipulated in the lease during the period of suspension. Such oil and gas lease shall remain in status quo, and all obligations and conditions existing during such lease or such of them as may be suspended by said Board, shall be inoperative and of no force and effect, except the obligation to pay delay rentals as provided for herein, until ninety (90) days after the Board for Lease of University Lands shall enter an order upon its minutes reciting that the cause for suspension has ceased to exist, at which time such oil and gas lease shall, provided the rental payments have been made during the period of suspension, again become operative and all of the suspended obligations and conditions, including the payment of rentals under same, shall again attach and be in force, and in the case of the suspension of the primary and/or principal terms of the lease, the lease shall thereafter continue in force for a period equivalent to the unexpired term of the lease on the date or origin of the cause for suspension. The Commissioner of the General Land Office shall give notice immediately to the lessee of the entry of the order that the cause for suspension has ceased to exist; provided, however, that the annual rental payments have been met.

Acts 1945, 49th Leg., p. 300, ch. 217, Sec. 1.

Art. 5366a. EXTENSION OF OIL AND GAS LEASES ON AREAS COVERED BY COASTAL WATERS OR WITHIN GULF.

Sec. 1. In each case in which an oil and gas mineral lease has heretofore been granted or may hereafter be granted by the State of Texas on an area covered by the coastal waters of the State or within the Gulf of Mexico and in which the War Department of the United State refuses to grant a permit to the lessee or owner of such lease to drill a well thereon for oil, gas or other minerals (the area included in such lease being within the navigable waters of the United States) and in the event the primary term of such lease should expire during the period of time in which the War Department of the United States may continue to refuse to issue such permit, then and in such event the primary term of such lease is hereby extended for successive periods of one (1) year from and after the end of the original primary term of such lease while and so long as the War Department may continue such refusal to issue to the lessee or to the owner of such lease a permit to drill for oil, gas or other minerals, on the area covered thereby; provided, that in order to make such extensions effectual the lessee or the owner of such lease shall, during each of the annual periods during which the primary term of the lease is so extended, apply to and seek to obtain from the War Department a permit to drill a well for oil, gas or other minerals on the area covered by such lease and be unsuccessful in its attempts to obtain a permit, or, if successful in obtaining a permit, commence operations for drilling a well upon the leased premises within sixty (60) days after obtaining such permit; and provided further that the lessee or the owner of such lease continues to pay the annual renewal rentals at the rate provided for in such lease for the period of time involved in such extensions. Should such lease be so extended and should the War Department at any time while such lease is still in force and effect issue a permit to the lessee or to the owner of such lease to drill a well thereon for oil, gas or other minerals, such lease shall continue in force and effect if the lessee commences drilling operations upon the leased premises within sixty (60) days after obtaining such permit, and so long as the lessee or the owner of such lease shall continue to conduct drilling or mining operations thereon, or if oil, gas or other mineral be discovered thereon by the lessee or the owner of such lease, so long as oil, gas or other mineral is produced from such leased premises. Should the production of oil, gas or other mineral on said leased premises after once secured, cease from any cause, such lease shall not terminate if the lessee or owner of such lease commences additional drilling, reworking or mining operations within thirty (30) days thereafter or if it be within the original primary term of such lease, commences or resumes the payment or tender of rental on or before the rental paying date, if any, next ensuing; but if there be no rental paying date next ensuing, the lease shall in no event terminate prior to the expiration of the primary term.

Sec. 2. The Commissioner of the General Land Office is hereby authorized to issue to the lessee or owner of said lease such instrument in writing in the nature of an extension of said lease as may be necessary or proper to carry into effect the foregoing provisions of this Act.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 456, ch. 287.